Utah statutes.
76-10-1506 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Threatening breach of peace -- Disorderly conduct -- Foul language -- Refusing requests -- Use of controlled substance, liquor, or tobacco -- Ejection of passenger.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class C misdemeanor, if the person:

(a)  threatens a breach of the peace, is disorderly, or uses obscene, profane, or vulgar language on a bus;

(b)  is in or upon any bus while unlawfully under the influence of a controlled substance as defined in Section 58-37-2;

(c)  fails to obey a reasonable request or order of a bus driver, bus company representative, a nondrinking designee other than the driver as provided in Subsection 32A-12-213(3)(c)(ii), or other person in charge or control of a bus or terminal;

(d)  ingests any controlled substance, unless prescribed by a physician or medical facility, in or upon any bus, or drinks intoxicating liquor in or upon any bus, except a chartered bus as defined and provided in Sections 32A-1-105 and 41-6a-526; or

(e)  smokes tobacco or other products in or upon any bus, except a chartered bus.

(2)  If any person violates Subsection (1), the driver of the bus or person in charge thereof may stop at the place where the offense is committed or at the next regular or convenient stopping place and remove such person, using only such force as may be necessary to accomplish the removal, and the driver or person in charge may request the assistance of passengers to assist in the removal.

(3)  The driver or person in charge may cause the person so removed to be detained and delivered to the proper authorities.

